Utah statutes.
64-13-7.5.   Persons in need of mental health services -- Contracts.

(1)  Except as provided for in Subsection (2), when the department determines that a person in its custody is in need of mental health services, the department shall contract with the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, local mental health authorities, or the state hospital to provide mental health services for that person.  Those services may be provided at the Utah State Hospital or in community programs provided by or under contract with the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, a local mental health authority, or other public or private mental health care providers.

(2)  If the Division of Substance Abuse and Mental Health, a local mental health authority, or the state hospital notifies the department that it is unable to provide mental health services under Subsection (1), the department may contract with other public or private mental health care providers to provide mental health services for persons in its custody.

(3)  A person who provides mental health services for sex offender treatment as required in Section 64-13-6 shall be licensed as a mental health professional in accordance with Title 58, Chapter 60, Mental Health Professional Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 61, Psychologist Licensing Act, and exhibit competency to practice in the area of sex offender treatment based on education, training, and practice.



Amended by Chapter 8, 2002 Special Session 5

